test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-aahn_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Adjective - ääʹhn class A40e: # Adjective 'greedy/ahne' - full paradigm
    ääʹhn+A+Pred+Sg: ääʹhn
    ääʹhn+A+Pred+Pl: ääʹhn
    ääʹhn+A+Attr: ääʹhnes
    ääʹhn+A+Comp: ääʹhnab
    ääʹhn+A+Superl: ääʹhnmõs
